Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 34.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2907
Motor vehicle
record; disclosure; authorized purposes.

The department
and any officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department having custody
of a motor vehicle record shall, upon the verification of identity and purpose
of a requester, disclose and make available the requested motor vehicle record,
including the personal information in the record, for the following purposes:

(1) For use by any federal, state, or local governmental
agency, including any court or law enforcement agency, in carrying out the
agency's functions or by a private person or entity acting on behalf of a
governmental agency in carrying out the agency's functions;

(2) For use in connection with matters of motor vehicle or
driver safety and theft; motor vehicle emissions; motor vehicle product alterations,
recalls, or advisories; performance monitoring of motor vehicles, motor vehicle
parts, and dealers; motor vehicle market research activities, including survey
research; and removal of nonowner records from the original owner records
of motor vehicle manufacturers;

(3) For use in the normal course of business by a legitimate
business or its agents, employees, or contractors but only:

(a) To verify the accuracy of personal information submitted
by the individual to the business or its agents, employees, or contractors;
and

(b) If such information as so submitted is not correct or
is no longer correct, to obtain the correct information, but only for the
purposes of preventing fraud by, pursuing legal remedies against, or recovering
on a debt or security interest against, the individual;

(4) For use in connection with any civil, criminal, administrative,
or arbitral proceeding in any federal, state, or local court or governmental
agency or before any self-regulatory body, including service of process, investigation
in anticipation of litigation, and execution or enforcement of judgments and
orders, or pursuant to an order of a federal, state, or local court, an administrative
agency, or a self-regulatory body;

(5) For use in research activities, and for use in producing
statistical reports, so long as the personal information is not published,
redisclosed, or used to contact individuals;

(6) For use by any insurer or insurance support organization,
or by a self-insured entity, or its agents, employees, or contractors, in
connection with claims investigation activities, anti-fraud activities, rating,
or underwriting;

(7) For use in providing notice to the owners of abandoned,
towed, or impounded vehicles;

(8) For use only for a purpose permitted under this section
either by a private detective, plain clothes investigator, or private investigative
agency licensed under sections 71-3201 to 71-3213;

(9) For use by an employer or the employer's agent or insurer
to obtain or verify information relating to a holder of a commercial driver's
license that is required under the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of
1986, 49 U.S.C. 31301 et seq., or pursuant to sections 60-4,132 and 60-4,141;

(10) For use in connection with the operation of private
toll transportation facilities;

(11) For bulk distribution for surveys of, marketing to,
or solicitations of persons who have expressly consented to such disclosure
if the requester has obtained the notarized written consent of the individual
who is the subject of the personal information being requested and has provided
proof of receipt of such written consent to the department or an officer,
employee, agent, or contractor of the department on a form prescribed by the
department;

(12) For any use if the requester has obtained the notarized
written consent of the individual who is the subject of the personal information
being requested and has provided proof of receipt of such written consent
to the department or an officer, employee, agent, or contractor of the department;

(13) For use, including redisclosure through news publication,
of a member of a medium of communication as defined in section 20-145 who
requests such information in connection with preparing, researching, gathering,
or confirming news information involving motor vehicle or driver safety or
motor vehicle theft;

(14) For use by the federally designated organ procurement
organization for Nebraska to establish
and maintain the Donor Registry of Nebraska as provided in section 71-4822;
and

(15) For any other use specifically authorized by law that
is related to the operation of a motor vehicle or public safety.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 1317, § 13;

Laws 2004, LB 559, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 34.